Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-835
Violations; penalty.

Any person who willfully refuses to permit, interferes with, or prevents any inspection authorized by inspection warrant shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 231, § 6, p. 859;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 114.